Utah statutes.
73-10d-4.   Notice of intention to enter privatization project -- Petition
for election -- Election procedures -- Powers of political subdivision --
Public bidding laws not to apply.
(1)  The governing authority of any political subdivision considering entering
into a privatization project agreement shall issue a notice of intention
setting forth a brief summary of the agreement provisions and the time within
which and place at which petitions may be filed requesting the calling of an
election in the political subdivision to determine whether the agreement
should be approved.  The notice of intention shall specify the form of the
petitions.  If, within 30 days after the publication of the notice of
intention, petitions are filed with the clerk, recorder, or similar officer of
the political subdivision, signed by at least 5% of the qualified electors of
the political subdivision (as certified by the county clerks of the respective
counties within which the political subdivision is located) requesting an
election be held to authorize the agreement, then the governing authority
shall proceed to call and hold an election.  If an adequate petition is not
filed within 30 days, the governing authority may adopt a resolution so
finding and may proceed to enter into the agreement.
(2)  If, under Subsection (1), the governing authority of a political
subdivision is required to call an election to authorize an agreement, the
governing authority shall adopt a resolution directing that an election be
held in the political subdivision for the purpose of determining whether the
political subdivision may enter into the agreement.  The resolution calling
the election shall be adopted, notice of the election shall be given, voting
precincts shall be established, the election shall be held, voters'
qualifications shall be determined, and the results shall be canvassed in the
manner and subject to the conditions provided for in Title 11, Chapter 14,
Local Government Bonding Act.
(3)  A political subdivision may, upon approval of an agreement as provided by
Subsections (1) and (2) and subject to the powers and rules of the supervising
agency:
(a)  supervise and regulate the construction, maintenance, ownership, and
operation of all privatization projects within its jurisdiction or in which it
has a contractual interest;
(b)  contract, by entry into agreements with private owner/operators for the
provision within its jurisdiction of the services of privatization projects;
(c)  levy and collect taxes, as otherwise provided by law, and impose and
collect assessments, fees, or charges for services provided by privatization
projects, as appropriate, and, subject to any limitation imposed by the
constitution, pledge, assign, or otherwise convey as security for the payment
of its obligations under any agreements any revenues and receipts derived from
any assessments, fees, or charges for services provided by privatization
projects;
(d)  require the private owner/operator to obtain any and all licenses as
appropriate under federal, state, and local law and impose other requirements
which are necessary or desirable to discharge  the responsibility of the
political subdivision to supervise and regulate the construction, maintenance,
ownership, and operation of any privatization project;
(e)  control the right to contract, maintain, own, and operate any
privatization project and the services provided in connection with that
project within its jurisdiction;
(f)  purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire all or any part of a privatization
project;
(g)  with respect to the services of any privatization project, control the
right to establish or regulate the rates paid by the users of the services
within the jurisdiction of the political subdivision;
(h)  agree that the sole and exclusive right to provide the services within
its jurisdiction related to privatization projects be assumed by any private
owner/operator;
(i)  contract for the lease or purchase of land, facilities, equipment, and
vehicles for the operation of privatization projects;
(j)  lease, sell, or otherwise convey, as permitted by state and local law,
but without any requirement of competitive public bidding, land, facilities,
equipment, and vehicles, previously used in connection with privatization
projects, to private owner/operators; and
(k)  establish policies for the operation of any privatization project within
its jurisdiction or with respect to which it has a contractual interest,
including hours of operation, the character and kinds of services, and other
rules necessary for the safety of operating personnel.
(4)  Any political subdivision may enter into agreements with respect to
privatization projects.  Agreements may contain provisions relating to,
without limitation, any matter provided for in this section or consistent with
the purposes of this chapter.
(5)  Any agreement entered into between a political subdivision and a private
owner/operator for the provision of the services of a privatization project is
considered an exercise of that political subdivision's business or proprietary
power binding upon its succeeding governing authorities.  Any agreement made
by a political subdivision with a private owner/operator for payment for
services provided or to be provided may not be construed to be an indebtedness
or a lending of credit of the political subdivision within the meaning of any
constitutional or statutory restriction.
(6)  The provisions of the various laws of the state and the rules or
ordinances of a political subdivision which would otherwise require public
bidding in respect to any matter provided for in this chapter shall have no
application to that matter.
